Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 1

General Provisions

54-5-101. System of state highways — Designation by department for construction, repair or maintenance.

The department of transportation has full power, and it is made its duty, through its highway engineers or otherwise, to designate a system of state highways, to designate the road or roads to be constructed, repaired, or maintained by the use of the funds mentioned in chapter 2 of this title, and to lay out and locate all such roads.

Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 5; Shan., § 1720a29b16 (p. 6549); Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b47; Code 1932, § 3205; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-501; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Cross-References. Designation of parkway system, § 54-17-207.

Rules and regulations as to highway use, moving vehicles to conform, § 55-7-101.

Law Reviews.

Rulemaking Under the New Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (Shelley I. Stiles), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 171.

Comparative Legislation. State highways:

Ala. Code § 23-1-1 et seq.

Ark. Code § 27-67-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 32-4-20 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 177.010 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 65-3-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 227.010 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 136-45 et seq.

Va. Code § 33.1-25 et seq.

Cited: Fritts v. Leech, 201 Tenn. 18, 296 S.W.2d 834, 1956 Tenn. LEXIS 458 (1956); United States Fidelity & Guaranty Co. v. Thompson & Green Machinery Co., 568 S.W.2d 821, 1978 Tenn. LEXIS 613 (Tenn. 1978).

Collateral References.

Constitutionality and construction of statute relating to location or relocation of highways. 63 A.L.R. 516.

Power and duty of highway officers as regards location or route of road to be constructed or improved. 91 A.L.R. 242.

Prohibition to control action of administrative officers in establishment of highway. 115 A.L.R. 23, 159 A.L.R. 627.

Highways
97.1 et seq.

54-5-102. Main traveled roads — Designation.

The commissioner is given the power to proceed to designate main traveled roads, with a view to connecting all county seats, and also to designate other main traveled roads, that are deemed of sufficient importance to be included in the general highway plan of the state, and receive for their construction and improvement financial aid under this chapter and chapters 1 and 2 of this title.

It is the intent of the general assembly that all county seats should be connected by a four-lane highway to the nearest interstate highway by the best route available.

Acts 1919, ch. 149, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 33; Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b7; Code 1932, § 3176; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-502; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1995, ch. 348, § 3; 2007, ch. 155, § 1.

Cross-References. Designation of parkway system, § 54-17-207.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 9.

54-5-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter and chapters 1 and 2 of this title, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of transportation;

“Department” means the department of transportation; and

“Road” or “highway” is construed to include all bridges upon or that form a part of the highway to be constructed, reconstructed or maintained under this chapter and chapters 1 and 2 of this title.

Acts 1919, ch. 149, § 13; Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b13; Code 1932, § 3182; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-503.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 17.

54-5-104. Eminent domain.

The department is authorized to condemn the fee to, or an easement in, lands that may be necessary, suitable, or desirable for the construction, reconstruction, development, enlargement, maintenance, repair, drainage, or protection of any street, road, highway, freeway, or parkway, by the officials charged by law with the maintenance or construction of the street, road, highway, freeway, or parkway, including the power to acquire easements in lands adjacent to the lands for related slopes and drainage and any other similar purposes.

This section applies to all transportation purposes, as well as for highway purposes.

Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 5; Shan., § 1720a29b17 (p. 6549); Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b48; mod. Code 1932, § 3206; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 49, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-504; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Cross-References. Additional method of eminent domain, title 29, ch. 17, part 8.

Continuation of condemnation trial, § 29-17-1001.

State powers of eminent domain relating to rights-of-way and road improvement, §§ 54-22-101, 54-22-104.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 64; 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 17; 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 7.

54-5-105. Attorneys general to represent department.

The attorney general and reporter and the district attorney general in each case shall act as attorneys for the department without additional compensation.

Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 5; Shan., § 1720a29b18 (p. 6550); Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b49; Code 1932, § 3207; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-505; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Cross-References. District attorneys general representing department of transportation, § 8-6-303.

54-5-106. Judgments and expenses in condemnation cases paid out of county general funds.

All judgments rendered and other expenses necessarily incurred in condemnation proceedings shall be paid out of the general funds of the county in which the expenses are incurred and standing to the credit of the trustee, on the warrant or voucher of the county mayor drawn under the direction of the commissioner.

Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 5; Shan., § 1720a29b19 (p. 6550); impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 33; Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b50; Code 1932, § 3208; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-506; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — 1960 Tennessee Survey (James C. Kirby, Jr.), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 1021.

Cited: Williams v. Nicely, 230 S.W.3d 385, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 111 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 28, 2007).

54-5-107. Injunctions against interference — Cost bond unnecessary — Prompt hearings.

No cost bond is necessary in the suit. Injunction may be sought and obtained against all persons interfering in any way with the work of the department or any of its assistants or employees engaged in locating, laying out, or constructing any such roads.

It is the duty of all the chancellors and trial judges to grant injunctions and make all other orders that will facilitate the work of the department in locating and constructing roads under this part, and they shall promptly hear all cases in which the department may be interested.

Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 5; Shan., § 1720a29b20 (p. 6550); Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b51; Code 1932, § 3209; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-507; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 59.

54-5-108. Cooperation by department with federal government in designating roads, and in erection of danger signals and safety devices.

The department has full power, and it is made its duty, acting through its commissioner, to cooperate with the federal government in formulating and adopting a uniform system of numbering or designating roads of interstate character within this state, and in the selection and erection of uniform danger signals and safety devices for the protection and direction of traffic on those highways.

The department is empowered to expend out of the funds of the department any and all amounts necessary in the carrying out of this section.

The department has full power, and it is made its duty, acting through its commissioner, to formulate and adopt a manual for the design and location of signs, signals, markings, and for posting of traffic regulations on or along all streets and highways in Tennessee, and no signs, signals, markings or postings of traffic regulations shall be located on any street or highway in the state regardless of type or class of the governmental agency having jurisdiction of the streets and highways, except in conformity with the provisions contained in the manual.

Acts 1925, ch. 52, §§ 1, 2; Shan. Supp., §§ 1720a7b28, 1720a7b29; Code 1932, §§ 3187, 3188; Acts 1965, ch. 160, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-508; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 36.

Attorney General Opinions. County liability for failure to put up new road signs, OAG 95-032 (4/6/95).

Department of transportation has authority pursuant to T.C.A. § 54-5-108 to post traffic regulations on interstate highways within its jurisdiction. OAG 05-048 (4/19/05).

Cited: Johnson v. Oman Constr. Co., 519 S.W.2d 782, 1975 Tenn. LEXIS 713 (Tenn. 1975).

54-5-109. Plans and specifications and contracts for building each road or bridge authorized.

The department has full power, in conformity with the rules and regulations made or to be made by any officer or agency of the federal government authorized to make rules under any act of congress granting funds for the construction of roads, or rules made or to be made by the department, to make all plans and specifications for the building of each particular road or bridge to be constructed under its direction, to make all contracts for the construction of the road or bridge, and to supervise and superintend the construction of the road or bridge.

Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 6; Shan., § 1720a29b21 (p. 6550); Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b52; Code 1932, § 3210; modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-509; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Attorney General Opinions. There would be no legal prohibition against the building of a bridge on a state road by a non-profit foundation, provided that there were a prior contract between the department of transportation and the foundation, pursuant to T.C.A. § 54-5-109; and that, upon completion of the bridge, the planned conveyance of the bridge to the state could be accomplished pursuant to T.C.A. § 12-1-101, assuming the governor and the foundation agree as to terms and conditions of the transfer, as well as to uses and purposes of the property, OAG 02-103 (10/01/02).

54-5-110. Alteration of location and grades of road — Rights-of-way acquired by counties or commissioner — Filing of right-of-way plans — Appraisals.

Whenever the commissioner finds it necessary or advisable, the commissioner has the power to alter the course or grade or otherwise improve any road selected, adopted, or accepted for federal or state aid, and take over and improve as a state highway.

The counties in which the roads lie have the authority to acquire for the benefit of the state rights-of-way for the roads, either by donations by owners of the land through which the highways will run, by agreement between the owners and the county, or by the exercise of the power of eminent domain that is expressly conferred upon the counties; provided, that if the county authorities through which the road is designated do not act immediately upon request of the commissioner for the procurement and furnishing of rights-of-way, there is expressly given to the commissioner the right on behalf of the state to condemn by eminent domain all rights-of-way for the roads, all bluffs, gravel pits, and any and all other road material found necessary or advisable to be used by the commissioner; and provided, further, that the commissioner is empowered immediately upon the filing of the petition for condemnation of the rights-of-way and of road material to take possession of the designated rights-of-way, road material and other property sought to be condemned.

The state, when it exercises its power of eminent domain to make acquisitions for road purposes, or when it acquires land by voluntary purchase for road purposes, shall cause to be filed and recorded in the office of the register in the county where the acquisition is located the final right-of-way plans. The plans shall accurately portray the right-of-way, land, material, easement, or other legal right acquired and the precise location of the right-of-way, land, material, easement, or other legal right.

“Final right-of-way plans” means the entire plans of the project in any particular county, subject to subdivision (b)(1).

Notwithstanding any law or regulation to the contrary, when acquiring land by voluntary purchase for road purposes, the state, through the department of transportation or any agent of the department of transportation, shall, upon the request of the landowner, allow the landowner or the landowner's representative to examine the entire appraisal, if an appraisal was conducted. If an appraisal was not conducted, the landowner or landowner's representative may examine any other documents used to determine the proposed purchase price. This examination shall take place at the department's office for the region in which the property in question lies.

Acts 1919, ch. 149, § 9; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 33; Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b9; Code 1932, § 3178; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1979, ch. 164, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-510; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 2000, ch. 940, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, §§ 59, 64; 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 30; 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 42.

54-5-111. Rights-of-way for state highways — Liability for cost.

The state is liable for and shall be held to pay, through its department of transportation and as other highway expenses are paid, for all rights-of-way and damages and costs incident to the acquisition and use of rights-of-way, whether by condemnation suits or otherwise as provided by existing laws, necessary to the construction of any highway, or parts of any highway, designated and adopted by the department as and for a state or state and federal aid highway in the state's system of highways.

No county affected by the highways shall be liable for the rights-of-way and damages and costs incident to the acquisition and use of rights-of-way, nor shall any county pay or enter into an agreement to pay any part of the costs.

Acts 1931, ch. 57, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3178.1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1963, ch. 126, § 1; 1968, ch. 482, § 1; 1972, ch. 463, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-511; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Cross-References. Alteration of location and grades of road, rights-of-way acquired by counties or commissioner, filing of right-of-way plans, § 54-5-110.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 13.

Law Reviews.

Tax Limitations of Counties and Municipalities (M.P. O'Connor), 12 Tenn. L. Rev. 174.

Cited: Fritts v. Leech, 201 Tenn. 18, 296 S.W.2d 834, 1956 Tenn. LEXIS 458 (1956); Brooksbank v. Leech, 206 Tenn. 176, 332 S.W.2d 210, 1959 Tenn. LEXIS 333 (1959); McLain v. State, 59 Tenn. App. 529, 442 S.W.2d 637, 1968 Tenn. App. LEXIS 356 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1968); Hise v. State, 968 S.W.2d 852, 1997 Tenn. App. LEXIS 680 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1997); Leonard v. Knox County, 146 S.W.3d 589, 2004 Tenn. App. LEXIS 178 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2004); Williams v. Nicely, 230 S.W.3d 385, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 111 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 28, 2007).

54-5-112. County legislative bodies must authorize payment by counties.

No county is to have entered into an agreement to cooperate with the department upon any state or state and federal aid highway project unless the agreement is first authorized by resolution of the county legislative body regularly adopted upon and after submittal to that body by the department of a proposal for the project in proper form, setting forth in detail the proposed improvement with location and routing, the landowners and their respective properties in areas and improvements affected by the project, and, if required, the approximate damages and costs of the project.

Acts 1931, ch. 57, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 3178.2 (Williams, § 3178.3); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-512; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Cross-References. Alteration of location and grades of road, rights-of-way acquired by counties or commissioner, filing of right-of-way plans, § 54-5-110.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 13.

54-5-113. Contracts to be written and signed.

All contracts under which any highway funds are to be expended shall be in writing duly signed by the commissioner.

Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 6; Shan., § 1720a29b23 (p. 6550); impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 33; Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b54; Code 1932, § 3212; modified; Acts 1973, ch. 131, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-513; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 5.

Cross-References. Public contracts generally, title 12, ch. 4.

54-5-114. Notice for bids — Advertising — Preparing and filing bids — Waiver.

The department, before making contracts on its own behalf, or when acting as an agent, shall advertise for bids at least two (2) weeks prior to the date set for receiving bids by publishing a written notice on the department's Internet web site. The department may advertise for bids by publishing notice in a newspaper located in the county where the money is to be expended, in one (1) of the widely circulated daily newspapers in the grand division of the state where the work is to be done, or in other Internet or print media as the department may deem appropriate or necessary. Funding allocated by the department for purchasing advertising in a county having a population greater than two hundred fifty thousand (250,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and in counties located in rural west Tennessee, may be expended to purchase advertisements in one (1) or more newspapers published primarily for distribution within the county's African-American community.

The notice shall describe the work to be performed and shall enable the bidders to prepare their bids. All bids must be sealed and filed with the commissioner or the authorized agent of the department at the place designated in the notice on or before the time fixed in the notice.

The requirements of this section may be modified by the department in order to conform to any federal requirements that may accompany federal funds.

The requirements of this section may be waived as provided in § 54-1-135.

Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 6; Shan., § 1720a29b24 (p. 6550); Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b55; Code 1932, § 3213; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 42, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-514; impl. am. Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; Acts 1981, ch. 332, § 30; 1984, ch. 923, § 1; 1993, ch. 521, § 3; 2013, ch. 244, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) The department, before making contracts on its own behalf, or when acting as agent, shall advertise for bids at least two (2) weeks prior to the date set for receiving bids in some newspaper published in the county where the money is to be expended and also in one (1) of the widely circulated daily newspapers in that grand division of the state where the work is to be done. Funding allocated by the department for purchasing the advertising within a county having a population greater than two hundred fifty thousand (250,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and within counties located in rural west Tennessee, may be expended to purchase the advertisements within one (1) or more newspapers published primarily for distribution within the county's African-American community.“(b) In the event no newspaper is published in the county in which the work is to be done, advertisement shall be published in some newspaper in an adjacent county.“(c) The notice shall describe the work to be performed and shall enable the bidders to prepare their bids, which must be sealed and filed with the commissioner or the authorized agent of the department at a designated place on or before the time fixed in the notice.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 244, § 2. April 19, 2013.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Collateral References.

Authority of state, municipality, or other governmental entity to accept late bids for public works contracts. 49 A.L.R.5th 747.

“Emergency,” what is, within charter or statutory provision excepting emergency contract or work from requirement of bidding on public contracts. 71 A.L.R. 173.

Levee and flood control acts dispensing with bids in case of emergency. 70 A.L.R. 1294.

“Work,” what is covered by term, in statute relating to bids or proposals for public contracts. 92 A.L.R. 835.

54-5-115. Bonds to accompany bids.

The bids must be accompanied by proper bonds or guaranty that proper bond will be executed.

Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 6; Shan., § 1720a29b25 (p. 6550); Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b56; Code 1932, § 3214; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-515.

Collateral References.

Statutory condition prescribed for public contractor's bond as part of bond that does not in terms include it. 89 A.L.R. 446.

54-5-116. Opening bids and awarding contracts.

Sealed bids shall be opened in the presence of the bidders and public generally by the commissioner, or an authorized agent of the department, and the bidder making the best and most advantageous offer shall be awarded the contract by the department within thirty (30) days, upon complying with all requirements of the department, the lowest bid to be accepted.

Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 6; Shan., § 1720a29b26 (p. 6550); impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 33; Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b57; Code 1932, § 3215; Acts 1968, ch. 418, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-516; Acts 1981, ch. 264, §§ 6, 12.

Cited: Modjeski & Masters v. Pack, 215 Tenn. 629, 388 S.W.2d 144, 1965 Tenn. LEXIS 639 (1965); M. C. West, Inc. v. Lewis, 522 F. Supp. 338, 1981 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17879 (M.D. Tenn. 1981).

Collateral References.

Bond, for that bidder furnishes as affecting right to award contract to one other than lowest financial bidder. 86 A.L.R. 131.

Evasion of law requiring contract for public work to be let to lowest responsible bidder by subsequent changes in contract after it has been awarded pursuant to that law. 69 A.L.R. 697.

Federal funds requiring contractor, in case of public improvement aided by, to comply with conditions imposed by federal government as violation of requirement that contract be let to lowest responsible bidder. 113 A.L.R. 845.

Labor conditions or relations as factor in determining whether public contract should be let to lowest bidder. 110 A.L.R. 1406.

Mandamus to compel consideration, acceptance or rejection of bids. 80 A.L.R. 1382.

Variation by bidder from specifications on bid for public work. 65 A.L.R. 835.

54-5-117. Accepted bidder to be financially responsible and qualified under rules and regulations of commissioner.

Notwithstanding § 54-5-116, the bidder making the bid accepted shall be responsible and qualified under the laws of the state and under any valid rule or regulation of the commissioner; provided, that the commissioner is empowered to make reasonable rules and regulations the commissioner deems proper for the qualification of bidders as to financial responsibility, experience, organization and equipment, the number of contracts, the aggregate of the contract amounts at the contract unit prices, the character of construction, the number of miles of construction each bidder or contractor may have under contract or construction at one (1) time, or any other matter that would, in the commissioner's judgment, promote the best interests of the state in its highway construction, the power to make the rules and regulations being expressly not limited to rules and regulations as to the matters expressly listed in this section.

Acts 1929, ch. 80, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 3216; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-517; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

54-5-118. Rejection of bids.

Any and all bids may be rejected, in the discretion of the commissioner, and they shall be rejected if the best bid is not deemed reasonable and fair to the state.

Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 6; Shan., § 1720a29b26 (p. 6550); impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 33; Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b57; mod. Code 1932, § 3217; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-518; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

54-5-119. Contractors shall give bonds — Actions — Limitations.

All contractors with whom contracts are made by the department shall enter into good and solvent surety bond in an amount fixed by the department, conditioned that acceptance or service of process upon the commissioner shall be service on them as their agent duly authorized to that end, and for the full and faithful performance of every part and stipulation of the contract, especially the payment for all materials purchased and for all labor employed in the contemplated work. This bond shall be approved by the department and filed with its records.

All actions on bonds furnished under this section shall name the commissioner as a party-defendant and may be instituted in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state, but no action on bonds shall be commenced after the expiration of one (1) year following the date of the first publication of the notice provided for in § 54-5-122 with respect to the involved project.

Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 6; Shan., § 1720a29b27 (p. 6551); Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b58; mod. Code 1932, § 3218; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1967, ch. 380, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-519; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, § 12; 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 18; 23 Tenn. Juris., Suretyship, § 37.

Cited: Southland Tractors, Inc. v. H & N Constr. Co., 52 Tenn. App. 664, 377 S.W.2d 789, 1963 Tenn. App. LEXIS 122 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1963).

54-5-120. Inspection, approval and acceptance of work to be specified.

The contract shall provide that the work executed under the contract shall be subject to the inspection, approval, and acceptance of the commissioner acting on oath and under bond.

Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 6; Shan., § 1720a29b28 (p. 6551); Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b59; Code 1932, § 3219; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-520; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 7.

Collateral References.

Architect or engineer, conclusiveness of certificate or decision of, under building or construction contract. 54 A.L.R. 1255, 110 A.L.R. 137.

Construction of building or construction contract, powers of architect or engineer in respect of. 137 A.L.R. 530.

Extension of time, finality of decision of architect or engineer as to, for purposes of liability for liquidated damages where delay is due to acts of contractee or third person. 152 A.L.R. 1385.

54-5-121. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former 54-5-121 (Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 6; Shan., § 1720a29b29 (p. 6551); Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b60; Code 1932, § 3220; Acts 1959, ch. 176, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-521; Acts 1983, ch. 253, § 1), concerning limited payment before completion and acceptance of highway work, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 605, § 1, effective August 1, 2005.

54-5-122. Full settlement with contractor.

The department may close a project after the following have occurred:

The department shall provide thirty (30) days notice in some newspaper published in the county where the work is done, if there is a newspaper published there, and if not, in a newspaper in an adjoining county, that final settlement is about to be made and notifying all claimants to file notice of their claims with the department and the contractor's surety. The period for filing a notice of claim shall not be less than thirty (30) days after the last published notice. No notice of claim shall be valid unless it is verified by oath and filed after the publication of the first notice; and

The contractor shall furnish evidence to satisfy the department that all the material used by the contractor, its subcontractors or its agents has been fully paid for and all laborers and other employees working for the contractor, its subcontractors or its agents have been fully paid.

Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 6; Shan., § 1720a29b30 (p. 6551); Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b61; Code 1932, § 3221; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-522; Acts 1983, ch. 132, § 1; 1984, ch. 807, § 1; 2004, ch. 605, § 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 18; 23 Tenn. Juris., Suretyship, § 37.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

54-5-123. Sums withheld — Final settlement.

From the three and one half percent (3 ½%) retained on any contract executed prior to August 2005, that is being closed and to the extent the funds are due the contractor, the department shall withhold from the contractor a sum sufficient to pay all claims, of which notice is appropriately filed with the department, for a period of sixty (60) days from the date of the last advertising, to allow claimants to sue and prove their claims against the contractor or its agent, in some court of competent jurisdiction. In the event a civil action is brought against the contractor by any claimant within sixty (60) days from the day of the last advertising, the department shall pay the amount of the claim into court from any funds of the contractor the department is holding, if any. But in all cases where civil actions are not brought within sixty (60) days, the department shall pay any sums being held by the department, if any, to the contractor. No civil action shall be valid unless it is filed after the filing of a notice of claim with the department in accordance with § 54-5-122.

On the date set for full and final settlement with the contractor, the contractor may make proper refunding bond to the state for the amount of any sum or sums so held for the period of sixty (60) days, the bond to be approved by the department, whereupon it shall pay the contractor in full.

Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 6; Shan., § 1720a29b31 (p. 6551); Shan. Supp., 1720a7b62; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 33; Acts 1929, ch. 80, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 3222; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-523; Acts 1984, ch. 807, § 2; 2004, ch. 605, § 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 18.

Cited: Thompson & Green Machinery Co. v. Travelers Indem. Co., 57 Tenn. App. 592, 421 S.W.2d 643, 1967 Tenn. App. LEXIS 249 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1967).

54-5-124. Civil actions against contractors by claimants.

All civil actions against contractors brought by any claimant shall make the commissioner a defendant to the action by issuance of process from the county where the civil action was filed to the county of the defendant, and they shall be brought in the county where the main office of the department is situated or in any county in which any part of the work was prosecuted. In the event that the department is not holding sums due a contractor described in § 54-5-123(a) or upon payment of the amount specified in subsection (b), upon request by the commissioner, the commissioner shall be dismissed as a party.

When a civil action has been properly brought, in the event the department is holding any amount due a contractor described in § 54-5-123(a), the amount or the amount of the claim, whichever is less, shall be paid into court.

Acts 1929, ch. 80, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 3222; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-524; Acts 1984, ch. 807, § 3; 2004, ch. 605, §§ 4, 5.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 18.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee and Federal Interpleader (J. Harvey Cameron), 30 Tenn. L. Rev. 609.

54-5-125. Dismissal of suit as to commissioner — Oath of claimant — More than one claimant.

The petition shall be signed by the commissioner, or by the attorney for the department for the commissioner; and upon the filing of the petition accompanied by payment, the suit shall be dismissed as to the commissioner as a matter of right, the sum paid into court as to the plaintiff or claimant standing in lieu and as a satisfaction of the contractor's bond and a fulfillment of the duties of the department to the claimant or plaintiff.

No claimant shall file a claim with the department without verifying the claim by oath.

Where more than one (1) claimant files suit in the same court, the commissioner may embrace in one (1) petition the names of the claimants, the aggregate amounts of their claims, etc., accompanying the petition with photostats, and making payment by one (1) voucher to cover the whole.

Acts 1929, ch. 80, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 3222; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-525; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

54-5-126. Judge hearing suit — Procedure.

Where suit is brought by any claimant or claimants before a judge of the court of general sessions, the voucher or warrant shall be payable to the order of the judge before whom the suit is pending, but no judge shall endorse or have cashed the voucher or warrant until the disposition of the case or cases pending, when the judge may endorse and deliver the voucher or warrant to the party entitled to the voucher or warrant, or endorse and cash the voucher or warrant for the purpose of distribution of the proceeds to the parties entitled to the proceeds.

In all instances where the commissioner's decision is appealed unless the voucher or warrant is endorsed and cashed for the purposes of partial distribution, the judge shall endorse the voucher or warrant to the circuit court clerk on appeal and transmit it with the appeal papers.

Where the judge endorses and cashes the voucher or warrant for partial distribution, if any one (1) of several claimants appeals to the circuit court, the appellant shall transmit, with the appeal papers, cash equal to the amount of the claim concerning which the appeal or appeals are taken.

Acts 1929, ch. 80, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 3222; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-526; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3.

54-5-127. Final judgment in suit — Pro rata payments — Interest.

Upon final disposition of any case where suit is brought by a claimant or claimants, the court making final order and determination shall direct to be paid, and the judge of the court of general sessions or clerk shall pay, the sum or sums paid into court by the commissioner to the parties entitled to the sum or sums under the decree or judgment of the court.

In any instance when the aggregate of the claims filed with the commissioner in due time exceeds the aggregate retained or contract amounts due the contractor, the commissioner, in making payments into court as provided in subsection (a), if any, shall make the same on a pro rata basis.

A contractor shall be entitled to recover from the claimant, upon cross-petition duly filed, interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum, on so much of any money withheld from the contractor on account of any claim or part of the claim as is disallowed by the court, the interest to run from the date of settlement with the contractor to the date an order of the court is entered directing the disposition of funds paid into the court by the commissioner.

Acts 1929, ch. 80, § 1; Code 1932, § 3222; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1967, ch. 156, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-527; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

54-5-128. Prison labor — Using — Purchasing equipment.

Where satisfactory bids cannot be secured, or where, in the judgment of the department, it is more feasible to execute any work by prison labor or free labor, authority is given the department to use prison labor, either state or county, or free labor, and to purchase equipment necessary to carry on the work; provided, that the inmates shall be available by law at the time and satisfactory arrangements can be made by which they may be used.

When work is executed by means of labor of state inmates, the commissioner shall pay for the labor on the highway work according to rules and regulations prescribed by law and the state authorities, who may furnish the inmates, and, if the inmates so used are county inmates, the county authorities controlling the inmates shall receive pay for the labor at the price to be agreed upon by the commissioner and the respective county officials authorized to furnish the labor.

In case the commissioner is not able to make satisfactory arrangements to construct the highways with state or county inmate labor or by contract with other parties, then the commissioner is empowered to build and construct the highways, either on force account by contract or in a manner deemed advisable by the commissioner.

Acts 1917, ch. 77, § 6; Shan., § 1720a29b32 (p. 6551); Acts 1919, ch. 149, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 33; Shan. Supp., §§ 1720a7b11, 1720a7b63; Code 1932, §§ 3180, 3223; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-528; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Cross-References. Felons and other prisoners to work on roads, §§ 41-2-123 — 41-2-125.

Road work by convicts and prisoners, title 41, ch. 22.

54-5-129. Commissioner financing improvements of section of state highway system — Funds to be repaid without interest.

If any county, county commission or road board, district, city, town, person or corporation desires immediately to improve any section of the state highway system as designated and established by the commissioner, the commissioner may enter into an agreement with the county, county commission, or road board, district, city, or town officials, or other parties, to finance the construction or reconstruction of the highway or section of the highway, and any funds advanced to the commissioner pursuant to the agreement shall be repaid without interest, as and when the general assembly may provide the funds, and the commissioner may apportion the funds for the improvement.

Acts 1921, ch. 178, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 33; Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b22; Code 1932, § 3185; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-529; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.